Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-782
Health insurance provider; coverage of mental or nervous disorders; requirements.

No insurance company, health maintenance organization, or other health insurance provider shall deny payment for treatment of mental or nervous disorders under a policy, contract, certificate, or other evidence of coverage issued or delivered in Nebraska on the basis that the hospital or state institution licensed as a hospital by the Department of Health and Human Services and defined in section 71-419 providing such treatment is publicly funded and charges are reduced or no fee is charged depending on the patient's ability to pay.

Laws 1985, LB 487, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 162;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 240;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 71;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 177.